scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_n.yaml
     abwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabwaanaa
     abwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabwaanaa
     abwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidabwaanaa
     abwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabwaanaan
     abwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabwaanaad
     abwaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebwaanaad
     abwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abwaazh
     achigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indachigaanaa
     achigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odachigaanaan
     achigaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: achigaanaad
     achigaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: echigaanaad
     achigaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: achigaazh
     adima'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadima'anaa
     adima'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadima'anaan
     adima'azh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adima'anaad
     adima'azh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edima'anaad
     adima'azh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adima'azh
     adimanikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadimanikaanaa
     adimanikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadimanikaanaan
     adimanikaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adimanikaanaad
     adimanikaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edimanikaanaad
     adimanikaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adimanikaazh
     agaasiboozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasiboonaa
     agaasiboozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasiboonaan
     agaasiboozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasiboonaad
     agaasiboozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasiboonaad
     agaasiboozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasiboozh
     agaasikozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasikonaa
     agaasikozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasikonaan
     agaasikozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasikonaad
     agaasikozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasikonaad
     agaasikozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasikozh
     agaawaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagaawaanaa
     agaawaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaawaanaa
     agaawaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagaawaanaa
     agaawaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaawaanaan
     agaawaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaawaanaad
     agaawaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaawaanaad
     agaawaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+0: agwaawaazh
     agobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagobinaa
     agobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagobinaan
     agobizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agobinaad
     agobizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egobinaad
     agobizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agobizh
     agokazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagokanaa
     agokazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagokanaa
     agokazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagokanaa
     agokazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagokanaan
     agokazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agokanaad
     agokazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egokanaad
     agokazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agokazh
     agoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagoonaa
     agoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagoonaa
     agoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndagoonaa
     agoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagoonaan
     agoozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agoonaad
     agoozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egoonaad
     agoozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agoozh
     agwapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwapinaa
     agwapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwapinaa
     agwapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwapinaa
     agwapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwapinaan
     agwapizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwapinaad
     agwapizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwapinaad
     agwapizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwapizh
     agwaabizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaabinaa
     agwaabizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabinaa
     agwaabizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaabinaa
     agwaabizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabinaan
     agwaabizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabinaad
     agwaabizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabinaad
     agwaabizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabizh 
     agwaabiidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaabiidaabaanaa
     agwaabiidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabiidaabaanaan
     agwaabiidaabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabiidaabaanaad
     agwaabiidaabaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabiidaabaanaad
     agwaabiidaabaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabiidaabaazh
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaadaabaanaa
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaadaabaanaa
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaadaabaanaa
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaadaabaanaan
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaadaabaanaad
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaaadaabaanaad
     agwaadaabaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaadaabaazh
     agwaa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaa'oonaa
     agwaa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaa'oonaan
     agwaa'oozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaa'oonaad
     agwaa'oozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaa'oonaad
     agwaa'oozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaa'oozh
     agwaawizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaawinaa
     agwaawizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaawinaan
     agwaawizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaawinaad
     agwaawizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaawinaad
     agwaawizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaawizh
     ajidagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indajidagoonaa
     ajidagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindajidagoonaa
     ajidagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidajidagoonaa
     ajidagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajidagoonaan
     ajidagoozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ajidagoonaad
     ajidagoozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejidagoonaad
     ajidagoozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+3: ajidagoozh 
     ajidakizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indajidakinaa
     ajidakizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajidakinaan
     ajidakizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ajidakinaad
     ajidakizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejidakinaad
     ajidakizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ajidakizh
     akwaakoboozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakwaakoboonaa
     akwaakoboozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaakoboonaan
     akwaakoboozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaakoboonaad
     akwaakoboozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaakoboonaad
     akwaakoboozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaakoboozh
     akwaandawaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakwaandawaanaa
     akwaandawaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaandawaanaan
     akwaandawaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaandawaanaad
     akwaandawaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaandawaanaad
     akwaandawaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaandawaazh
     akwaandawedaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakwaandawedaabaanaa
     akwaandawedaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaandawedaabaanaan
     akwaandawedaabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaandawedaabaanaad
     akwaandawedaabaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaandawedaabaanaad
     akwaandawedaabaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaandawedaabaazh
     akwaandawewizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: indakwaandawewinaa
     akwaandawewizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaandawewinaan
     akwaandawewizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaandawewinaad
     akwaandawewizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaandawewinaad
     akwaandawewizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaandawewizh 
     andobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandobinaa
     andobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandobinaan
     andobizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andobinaad
     andobizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endobinaad
     andobizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andobizh
     andwaanikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandwaanikaanaa
     andwaanikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandwaanikaanaan
     andwaanikaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andwaanikaanaad
     andwaanikaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endwaanikaanaad
     andwaanikaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andwaanikaazh
     anima'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanima'anaa
     anima'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanima'anaa
     anima'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanima'anaa
     anima'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanima'anaan
     anima'azh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anima'anaad
     anima'azh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enima'anaad
     anima'azh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anima'azh 
     anima'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanima'oonaa
     anima'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanima'oonaa
     anima'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanima'oonaa
     anima'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanima'oonaan
     anima'oozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anima'oonaad
     anima'oozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enima'oonaad
     anima'oozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anima'oozh
     animaawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimaawanaa
     animaawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimaawanaan
     animaawazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animaawanaad
     animaawazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimaawanaad
     animaawazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animaawazh
     animibatwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimibatwaanaa
     animibatwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimibatwaanaa
     animibatwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimibatwaanaa
     animibatwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimibatwaanaan
     animibatwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animibatwaanaad
     animibatwaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimibatwaanaad
     animibatwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animibatwaazh
     animidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimidaabaanaa
     animidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimidaabaanaan
     animidaabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animidaabaanaad
     animidaabaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimidaabaanaad
     animikwagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimikwagoonaa
     animikwagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikwagoonaan
     animikwagoozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikwagoonaad
     animikwagoozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikwagoonaad
     animikwagoozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animikwagoozh
     animinigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaniminigaanaa
     animinigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaniminigaanaan
     animinigaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animinigaanaad
     animinigaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eniminigaanaad
     animinigaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animinigaazh
     animiwizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimiwinaa
     animiwizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimiwinaa
     animiwizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimiwinaa
     animiwizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimiwinaan
     animiwizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animiwinaad
     animiwizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimiwinaad
     animiwizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animiwizh
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanishinaabewinikaanaa
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanishinaabewinikaanaa
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanishinaabewinikaanaa
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanishinaabewinikaanaan
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anishinaabewinikaanaad
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enishinaabewinikaanaad
     anishinaabewinikaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anishinaabewinikaazh 
     anokaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanokaanaa
     anokaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanokaanaa
     anokaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanokaanaa
     anokaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanokaanaan
     anokaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anokaanaad
     anokaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enokaanaad
     anokaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anokaazh 
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanoonaa
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanoonaa
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanoonaa
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindanoonig
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidanoonin
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidanoozh
     anoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanoonaan
     anoozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anoonaad
     anoozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enoonaad
     anoozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anoozh
     apabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapabaanaa
     apabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapabaanaan
     apabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apabaanaad
     apabaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epabaanaad
     apabaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apabaazh
     apagizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapaginaa
